Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1233
Bridge commission; records; reports; city council; examinations.

The bridge commission of a city of the metropolitan class shall keep an accurate record of all its acts, the property entrusted to the bridge commission, the cost of the bridge or bridges, and incidents thereto, the expenditures for maintaining, repairing, and operating such bridges, and the daily tolls collected. Such records shall be public records and the property of the city. A semiannual statement shall be published on each bond interest date in the official newspaper of the city. The city council shall have the power to examine such accounts at any time, to call for any reports at any time in its discretion, and to require the bridge commission and its employees to appear before the city council to report or testify at any time.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 15, p. 625;

C.S.1929, § 14-1215;

R.S.1943, § 14-1233;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 266.
July 21, 2022